Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.033

Election on proposition to designate person elected to position one as chair—Subsequent holders of position one to be chair.

The city council of a council-manager city may by resolution place before the voters of the city, a proposition to designate the person elected to council position one as the chair of the council with the powers and duties set forth in RCW 35A.13.030. If a majority of those voting on the proposition cast a positive vote, then at all subsequent general elections at which position one is on the ballot, the person who is elected to position one shall become the chair upon taking office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3019; 1975 1st ex.s. c 155 s 3.]